Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202653-169
Manufacturer or wholesaler; craft brewery, manufacturer, or microdistillery licensee; limitations; exception for sponsorship or advertising agreement.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no manufacturer or wholesaler shall directly or indirectly: (a) Pay for any license to sell alcoholic liquor at retail or advance, furnish, lend, or give money for payment of such license; (b) purchase or become the owner of any note, mortgage, or other evidence of indebtedness of such licensee or any form of security therefor; (c) be interested in the ownership, conduct, or operation of the business of any licensee authorized to sell alcoholic liquor at retail; or (d) be interested directly or indirectly or as owner, part owner, lessee, or lessor thereof in any premises upon which alcoholic liquor is sold at retail.

(2) This section does not apply to the holder of a farm winery license. The holder of a craft brewery license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.14 and the holder of a manufacturer's license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.01 with respect to the manufacture, distribution, and retail sale of beer, and except as provided in subsection (2) of section 53-123.14, the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a craft brewery license or of a manufacturer's license issued pursuant to section 53-123.01 to engage in the wholesale distribution of beer. The holder of a microdistillery license shall have the privileges and duties listed in section 53-123.16 with respect to the manufacture of alcoholic liquor, and except as provided in subsection (2) of section 53-123.16, the Nebraska Liquor Control Act shall not be construed to permit the holder of a microdistillery license to engage in the wholesale distribution of alcoholic liquor.

(3) It shall not be a violation of this section for a wholesaler or manufacturer or the agent of a wholesaler or manufacturer to enter into a sponsorship or advertising agreement with a licensee, organization, or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska pursuant to section 53-165.03.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 30, p. 396;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-330;

R.S.1943, § 53-169;

Laws 1947, c. 187, § 2, p. 619;

Laws 1953, c. 182, § 3, p. 574;

Laws 1961, c. 258, § 5, p. 765;

Laws 1971, LB 751, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 483, § 3;

Laws 1985, LB 183, § 5;

Laws 1985, LB 279, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 1089, § 24;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 54;

Laws 1996, LB 750, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB549, § 17;

Laws 2016, LB1105, § 25;

Laws 2022, LB1236, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB376, § 13.